California statutes. Streets and Highways Code
If the legislative body is unable to make the findings required by Section 9525, it may proceed with refunding and reassessment by preliminarily approving the report and by fixing a time and place for hearing on the report and on the proposed refunding and reassessment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 496, Sec. 1.   Effective July 17, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

9527.

Notice of the hearing shall be given by publication, pursuant to Section 6062a of the Government Code, in a newspaper of general circulation published in the city or, if there is no newspaper published in the city, then in a newspaper of general circulation published in the county in which the city is located, and by mailing in the time and manner required by Section 10306; or, if the reassessment will not be in the same or lesser amount than the original assessments, in the manner set forth in Section 54954.6 of the Government Code. The notice shall set forth the fact and date of the adoption of the resolution of intention and of the filing of the report and all of the following:

(a) A statement of the time, place, and purpose of the hearing on the resolution of intention and report.

(b) A statement of the total estimated cost of the proposed reassessment and refunding.

(c) The amount, as shown by the report, to be reassessed against the particular parcel covered by the notice.

(d) A statement that any person interested may file a protest in writing as provided in this division.

(e) A reference to the resolution of intention and report on file in the office of the city clerk for particulars.

Any consents of landowners required by the state or federal constitutions shall be obtained in the time, form, and manner required by Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 9180) of Division 11, the terms of which are hereby referred to and incorporated herein by reference.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1194, Sec. 8.   Effective October 11, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

9528.

Any person interested in any of the property to be reassessed may file a written protest against the proposed refunding or the amount reassessed against that person’s or any other property, as shown in the statement, at, or at any time prior to, the time fixed for the hearing on the refunding and assessment. The protest shall specifically set forth the nature thereof. Failure to file a written protest shall be a waiver of any right which the person may have or claim.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 496, Sec. 1.   Effective July 17, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

9529.

Any person who files a protest shall have full opportunity to be heard thereon.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 496, Sec. 1.   Effective July 17, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

9530.

At the time and place fixed for the hearing, the legislative body shall hear any complaints or objections that may be made concerning the proposed refunding, the amount of unpaid assessments, or the amounts of proposed reassessments as to any of the parcels of land to be reassessed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 496, Sec. 1.   Effective July 17, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

9531.

At the hearing, no objections to the regularity of the proceedings with reference to the making of the improvements or the validity or the amount of any assessment levied in the original proceedings shall be considered. All other objections to any reassessment shall be deemed waived unless presented at the time and in the manner specified in this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 496, Sec. 1.   Effective July 17, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

9532.

The determination of the legislative body upon all objections or protests shall be final and conclusive.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 496, Sec. 1.   Effective July 17, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

9533.

The hearing may be continued from time to time by order entered in the minutes, but shall be concluded within 30 days from the date originally fixed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 496, Sec. 1.   Effective July 17, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

9534.

At the hearing, the legislative body may review and correct the amount of any reassessments upon any parcel of land.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 496, Sec. 1.   Effective July 17, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

9534.5.

If the legislative body finds that protests against the proposed refunding or the proposed reassessments are signed by the owners of more than one-half of the area of the land proposed for reassessment, all further proceedings under the resolution of intention to refund are barred, and no new resolution of intention for the same refunding may be passed within six months after the decision of the legislative body on the hearing, unless the protests are overruled by an affirmative vote of four-fifths of the members of the legislative body. The legislative body may confirm, modify, or correct the proposed assessment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 496, Sec. 1.   Effective July 17, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

9535.

At the conclusion of the hearing, in the absence of a majority protest pursuant to Section 9534.5, the report and the reassessment as originally made, or as reviewed and corrected, shall be approved and confirmed by resolution entered upon the minutes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 496, Sec. 1.   Effective July 17, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

9536.

When the reassessment, as made or as reviewed and corrected, has been confirmed by the legislative body, it shall be recorded in the office of the superintendent of streets.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 496, Sec. 1.   Effective July 17, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

9537.

When recorded with the superintendent of streets and upon compliance with the provisions of Division 4.5 (commencing with Section 3100), the reassessment shall become a lien upon the various parcels of land assessed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 496, Sec. 1.   Effective July 17, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

9538.

Except as otherwise provided in this section and in Sections 9546, 9547, and 9548, assessments originally levied, and all penalties and interest accrued thereon, which are included within the reassessments, shall be deemed superseded and supplanted by the reassessments. If, and to the extent that, the reassessments do not include unpaid installments of assessments originally levied and the penalties and interest thereon, the lien of the original assessments is not superseded and supplanted.

For purposes of this section and Section 9539, “unpaid installments” means those installments which are delinquent and those which are or may be posted to the tax roll for the fiscal year during which the reassessment is confirmed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 874, Sec. 16.   Effective September 17, 1986.)
-------------------------------------------

9539.

Except as provided in Section 9548, the lien of the reassessments shall be given superiority and priority as of the date that the original assessments became a lien upon the property reassessed. The lien of unpaid installments of the assessments originally levied and the penalties and interest thereon, and the lien of any remaining portion of the original assessments not securing refunded bonds, are equal in priority to the lien of the reassessments.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 874, Sec. 17.   Effective September 17, 1986.)
-------------------------------------------

9540.

Reassessments and each installment thereof and the interest and penalties thereon shall be a lien against the parcels of land on which made until the same are paid, but for a period not exceeding the time within which an action might be brought on the last series of refunding bonds issued upon the security of the unpaid reassessments.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 496, Sec. 1.   Effective July 17, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

9541.

Unmatured installments, interest, and penalties on unpaid reassessments shall not be deemed to be within the terms of any general warranty of title as to any parcel against which a reassessment is made.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 496, Sec. 1.   Effective July 17, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

9542.

When refunding bonds are issued, the reassessments and any reassessments which may be issued thereon or in lieu thereof, together with interest thereon, shall remain and constitute a trust fund for the redemption and payment of the refunding bonds and the interest thereon.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 496, Sec. 1.   Effective July 17, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

9543.

A copy of the resolution of the legislative body confirming the reassessments upon the security of which the refunding bonds are issued shall be filed in the office of the auditor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 496, Sec. 1.   Effective July 17, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

9544.

The auditor shall keep a record in his office showing the several installments of principal and interest on the reassessments which are to be collected in each year during the term of the bonds.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 496, Sec. 1.   Effective July 17, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

9545.

The reassessments and interest thereon shall be collected on the assessment roll and are subject to reassessment, amendment, and prepayment, and are otherwise subject to all of the provisions of the act in the same manner and subject to the same remedies on default and to the payment of interest and penalties on the enforcement thereof as were the original assessments which were superseded and replaced by the reassessments. For these purposes, the applicable provisions of Parts 8, 9, 10, 10.5, 11, 11.1, 13, 14, and 15 of Division 10 are hereby referred to and incorporated herein by reference.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 496, Sec. 1.   Effective July 17, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

9546.

The legislative body of any city which has issued bonds which are outstanding under this division, the original authorized aggregate principal amount of which was less than the aggregate principal amount of the original assessment which was levied as security therefor, and which intends to issue additional bonds to be secured by that original assessment to provide for and finance the construction and installation of further improvements, may, at any time, determine by resolution that the public interest or necessity requires the refunding of the bonds which are outstanding, the levy of a reassessment as security for the refunding bonds, and the continuation of the original assessment as to the unpaid principal amount thereof which shall be security for the additional bonds to be issued, and may declare its intention to so proceed by a resolution adopted pursuant to Section 9520.

The resolution shall, in addition to declaring the intention of the legislative body to refund the bonds which are outstanding and to levy reassessments as security for the refunding bonds, also declare the intention of the legislative body to issue additional bonds on the basis of the original assessment and to continue the original assessment in an amount sufficient to provide security for the additional bonds to be issued. The resolution shall require that the report prepared pursuant to Section 9523 contain the unpaid principal amount of each original assessment in excess of the amount thereof which will be superseded and supplanted by the principal amount of the corresponding reassessment, which shall be security for the additional bonds to be issued.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 874, Sec. 18.   Effective September 17, 1986.)
-------------------------------------------

9547.

If the legislative body elects to proceed pursuant to Section 9546, Sections 9523 to 9545, inclusive, shall apply to the reassessments to be levied. Upon confirming the reassessment, the legislative body shall, in the resolution adopted pursuant to Section 9535, order that the lien of the original assessment continue as to the portion of the unpaid principal amount thereof which will be security for the additional bonds which are to be issued on the basis thereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 874, Sec. 19.   Effective September 17, 1986.)
-------------------------------------------

9548.

If the legislative body elects to proceed pursuant to Section 9546, upon confirmation of the reassessment as provided in Section 9535 and in compliance with Sections 9536 and 9537, the lien of the reassessment supersedes and supplants the lien of the original assessment as to the portion of the unpaid principal amount thereof which was security for the bonds which are to be refunded, but the lien of the original assessment continues as to the portion of the unpaid principal amount thereof which is security for the additional bonds which are to be issued on the basis thereof until the expiration of four years after the due date of the last installment on the reassessment.

The lien of the reassessment and the lien of the continued portion of the original assessment have equal priority as to the date the original assessment became a lien upon the property assessed.

The notice of reassessment filed pursuant to Section 3114 shall be entitled “Notice of Reassessment and Continuation of Assessment” and shall specify the relationship between the reassessment and the continuing amount of the original assessment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 874, Sec. 20.   Effective September 17, 1986.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 3. Issuance of Refunding Bonds [9600. - 9622.]

9600.

In this chapter, the following terms are used with the following meanings:

(a) “Costs of issuing refunding bonds” means those of the following costs and expenses which are designated by the legislative body in the resolution providing for the issuance of the bonds.

(1) All expenses incident to the calling, retiring, or paying of the bonds to be refunded and to the issuance of refunding bonds, including, but not limited to, any bond counsel, financial consultants, underwriters, certified public accountants, and rating agency fees, printing and advertising costs, city administrative expenses, and the charges of any escrow agent or trustee in connection with the issuance of the refunding bonds or in connection with the redemption or retirement of the bonds to be refunded.

(2) Interest upon the refunding bonds from the September 2 next preceding the date of sale thereof to not later than the September 2 next succeeding two years from the date.

(3) Any accrued and unpaid interest on the bonds to be refunded.

(4) Any premium necessary in the calling or retiring of the bonds to be refunded.

(5) Any amount that the city pays or transfers, or has previously paid or transferred, either from a special reserve fund or from surplus funds, into the redemption fund securing the bonds to be refunded and the penalties and interest thereon, if the amounts and the penalties and interest thereon are included in and limited to the particular reassessments levied upon those subdivisions of land securing the original assessment installments which are delinquent and for which the payments or transfers are made.

(b) “Designated costs of issuing the refunding bonds” means whichever of the items specified in paragraphs (1), (2), (3), (4), and (5) of subdivision (a) which are designated by the legislative body in the resolution providing for the issuance of refunding bonds.

(c) “Federal securities” means those securities described in Sections 1360 and 1360.1 of the Financial Code and includes United States Treasury notes, bonds, bills, or certificates of indebtedness, or obligations for which the faith and credit of the United States are pledged for the payment of principal and interest, including the guaranteed portions of small business administration loans, so long as the loans are obligations for which the faith and credit of the United States are pledged for the payment of principal and interest.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 874, Sec. 21.   Effective September 17, 1986.)
-------------------------------------------

9601.

The legislative body shall provide for the issuance of the refunding bonds by resolution.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 496, Sec. 1.   Effective July 17, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

9601.5.

Section 8769 shall apply to bonds issued pursuant to this division in the County of San Bernardino.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 10, Sec. 1.   Effective April 28, 1987.)
-------------------------------------------

9602.

The refunding bonds shall be issued in a principal amount equal to the total principal amount of the reassessment as approved and confirmed by the legislative body pursuant to either Section 9525 or Section 9535.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 496, Sec. 1.   Effective July 17, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

9603.

The refunding bonds shall represent and be secured by the reassessments and any later reassessments which may be levied or issued upon the same property in lieu of the reassessments.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 496, Sec. 1.   Effective July 17, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

9604.

Refunding bonds issued pursuant to this division shall comply with the following requirements which shall be set forth in the resolution adopted pursuant to Section 9601:

(a) Bonds shall be in the fully registered form and of the denominations as the legislative body may determine.

(b) The bonds shall be dated on or after the date of the recording of the reassessment.

(c) Bonds shall be signed by the treasurer and the clerk, except that the legislative body may, by order, authorize the use of bonds with an engraved, printed, or lithographed signature of the treasurer and the clerk in lieu of a signature by hand. The legislative body may also authorize its seal to be placed on the bonds in a similar manner.

(d) Bonds shall be numbered appropriately and shall bear interest and mature as provided in the contract with the bond purchasers.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 874, Sec. 22.   Effective September 17, 1986.)
-------------------------------------------

9605.

All of the refunding bonds shall mature on September 2.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 65, Sec. 31.   Effective June 6, 1985.)
-------------------------------------------

9606.

In no event shall the first maturity of any refunding bonds be earlier than the second day of September next succeeding 12 months after the date of the bonds.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 65, Sec. 32.   Effective June 6, 1985.)
-------------------------------------------

9607.

The last maturity of any refunding bonds shall not exceed 39 years from the second day of September next succeeding 12 months after the date of the bonds.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1388, Sec. 25.)
-------------------------------------------

9607.5.

For refunding bonds issued in the County of San Bernardino, the last maturity of any of these bonds shall not exceed the longest maturity currently authorized for bonds by the law pursuant to which the bonds to be refunded were issued.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 10, Sec. 2.   Effective April 28, 1987.)
-------------------------------------------

9608.

The rate of interest on refunding bonds shall not exceed the rate set forth in the resolution of intention adopted pursuant to Section 9520.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 496, Sec. 1.   Effective July 17, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

9609.

The interest on refunding bonds shall be payable on March 2, and September 2, respectively, of each year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 65, Sec. 34.   Effective June 6, 1985.)
-------------------------------------------

9610.

The first interest payment on the bonds shall be March 2 next preceding the second day of September next succeeding 12 months after the date of the bonds, except that, if any portion of the interest is funded, the legislative body may specify that the first payment of interest shall become due on any earlier interest payment date following the date of the bonds.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 874, Sec. 23.   Effective September 17, 1986.)
-------------------------------------------

9611.

Refunding bonds and the interest thereon shall be paid at the office of the treasurer or at any other place as is set forth in the bonds.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 496, Sec. 1.   Effective July 17, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

9612.

Each bond shall be conclusive evidence of the regularity of all proceedings for the levy of reassessments and the issuance of the refunding bonds and of the validity of said bonds and of all proceedings of which the bonds refunded were conclusive evidence.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 496, Sec. 1.   Effective July 17, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

9613.

Refunding bonds issued pursuant to this chapter may be exchanged for the bonds to be refunded on any basis the legislative body determines is for the benefit of the city if the bondholders consent to the exchange. As an alternative to exchanging the refunding bonds for the bonds to be refunded, the legislative body may sell the refunding bonds at public or private sale and at a price at or below par or with a premium. The proceeds of any sale of refunding bonds for cash shall be placed in the treasury of the local agency to the credit of a fund to be established for the purpose of refunding the bonds to be refunded, and the proceeds shall be applied only as permitted by this division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1388, Sec. 26.)
-------------------------------------------

9614.

The designated costs of issuing the refunding bonds may be paid by the purchaser of the refunding bonds or may be paid from any other legally available source, including the general fund of the city, other available revenues of the city under the control of the legislative body, the proceeds of sale of the refunding bonds, the interest or other gain derived from the investment of any of the proceeds of sale of the refunding bonds, any other moneys in escrow or in trust or any combination thereof as the legislative body may determine.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 496, Sec. 1.   Effective July 17, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

9615.

Any proceeds of sale of any refunding bonds may be deposited in escrow or trust with any bank or trust company within or without the state, or both within and without the state, shall be secured in accordance with the laws applicable to funds of the city and shall be invested in federal securities.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 496, Sec. 1.   Effective July 17, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

9616.

The proceeds and investments in escrow or trust shall be in an amount at the time of issuance of such refunding bonds which is certified by a certified public accountant licensed to practice in this state to be sufficient, together with any interest or other gain to be derived from any such investment, to pay the principal of and interest and redemption premiums, if any, on the refunded bonds as they become due or at designated dates prior to maturity (in connection with which the legislative body has exercised or has obligated itself to exercise a redemption privilege on behalf of the city), and the designated costs of issuance of the refunding bonds.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 496, Sec. 1.   Effective July 17, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

9617.

Following the issuance of any refunding bonds pursuant to this article, the legislative body of the city shall provide for the payment of principal and interest thereon in the same manner and at the same times as it provides for payment of principal and interest on bonds issued pursuant to the act. The reassessments levied pursuant to this division shall be and constitute security for the payment of the refunding bonds in the same manner as the original unpaid assessments constituted security for the refunded bonds.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 496, Sec. 1.   Effective July 17, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

9618.

Any outstanding refunded bonds which have been exchanged for refunding bonds shall be canceled by the city treasurer.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 496, Sec. 1.   Effective July 17, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

9619.

The treasurer shall keep a register in his or her office which shall show the series, number, date, amount, rate of interest, and registered owner of each bond. The treasurer shall cancel and file each bond paid.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 496, Sec. 1.   Effective July 17, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

9620.

The legislative body may provide, in the resolution authorizing the issuance of the refunding bonds, for the establishment from the proceeds of the sale of the refunding bonds of a special reserve fund for the refunding bonds pursuant to Part 16 (commencing with Section 8880) of Division 10.

If the legislative body elects to establish the reserve fund, it shall provide, in the resolution adopted pursuant to Section 9520, for the inclusion of the amount of the special reserve fund in the reassessment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 874, Sec. 24.   Effective September 17, 1986.)
-------------------------------------------

9622.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this part, bonds originally issued as variable rate bonds pursuant to Part 6.5 (commencing with Section 8660) may be refunded by the issuance of variable rate bonds issued pursuant to that Part 6.5. For purposes of this section and that Part 6.5 “bonds” includes “refunding bonds.”

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 446, Sec. 20.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 4. Curation and Validation [9700. - 9707.]

9700.

The validity of any refunding bonds issued under this division shall not be contested in any action, suit, or proceeding unless the action or proceeding is brought within 30 days after the adoption of the resolution providing for their issuance.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 496, Sec. 1.   Effective July 17, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

9701.

After the reassessment has been confirmed, it shall not be contested in any way other than at the time and in the manner specified in this division, and in any action, all findings, conclusions and determinations of the legislative body which conducted the reassessment proceedings shall be conclusive in the absence of actual fraud.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 496, Sec. 1.   Effective July 17, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

9702.

No defect in the form of any reassessment levied pursuant to this division and no statutory defect in any of the proceedings relating to the reassessment and refunding shall in any way invalidate any reassessment or any refunding bond.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 496, Sec. 1.   Effective July 17, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

9703.

No bond, reassessment, or installment thereof, or of the interest or penalties thereon, and no certificate of sale or deed shall be held invalid for error in the computation of the proper amount due on it if the error be found to be comparatively negligible or is found to be in favor of the owner of real property affected thereby.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 496, Sec. 1.   Effective July 17, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

9704.

An action to determine the validity of a reassessment and of any refunding bonds issued or to be issued thereon may be brought pursuant to Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 860) of Title 10 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure. For that purpose, the reassessment shall be deemed to be in existence upon its confirmation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 496, Sec. 1.   Effective July 17, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

9705.

If any reassessment or any refunding bond is held illegal or invalid in any action or proceeding upon any ground which would apply to the entire reassessment or the entire issue of refunding bonds, then the unpaid bonds refunded remain in full force and effect. If the unpaid bonds have been canceled, the treasurer of the city which conducted the invalid refunding or reassessment proceedings shall issue new bonds of the same tenor, force, and effect as the canceled unpaid bonds.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 496, Sec. 1.   Effective July 17, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

9706.

If refunding bonds are invalidated or held to be illegal, all of the provisions of the act shall apply to the original bonds and to any bonds issued under Section 9705 to replace the original bonds.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 496, Sec. 1.   Effective July 17, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

9707.

No action or proceeding to set aside, cancel, avoid, annul, or correct any reassessment levied under this division, or to review any of the proceedings, acts, or determinations made in the proceedings for the reassessment and the issuance of refunding bonds, or to question the validity of or enjoin the collection of the reassessment or any of the reassessments therein, or to enjoin the issuance of any bonds to represent reassessments, shall be maintained by any person, nor shall any person urge, plead or prove, the invalidity of any reassessment or any refunding bond in any action, unless the action is commenced within 30 days from the date of adoption of the resolution providing for the issuance of the refunding bonds.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 496, Sec. 1.   Effective July 17, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 12. THE MUNICIPAL IMPROVEMENT ACT OF 1913 [10000. - 10706.]



CHAPTER 1. General Provisions [10000. - 10016.]

10000.

This division may be cited as the Municipal Improvement Act of 1913.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 192.)
-------------------------------------------

10001.

Unless the context otherwise requires, the definitions contained in this part shall govern the construction of this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 192.)
-------------------------------------------

10002.

“Improvement” includes all work and improvements authorized to be done under this division which are for a public purpose or which are necessary or incidental to a public purpose.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1963, Ch. 342.)
-------------------------------------------

10003.

“Municipality” and “city” include every city, city and county, or county, or other entity, public corporation, or agency authorized to operate under this division, including any joint powers entity created pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 6500) of Division 7 of Title 1 of the Government Code and any special district organized for the purpose of aiding in the development or improvement of navigation or commerce to, or within, the district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1197, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

10004.

“Legislative body” includes any body which by law is the legislative department of government of the city, or municipality.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 192.)
-------------------------------------------

10005.

“City treasurer” includes any person or officer who has charge and makes payments of the city or municipal funds.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 192.)
-------------------------------------------

10006.

“Install” includes construct, reconstruct, extend, repair, and maintain.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 192.)
-------------------------------------------

10006.5.

Subject to the limitation of Section 10204.1, “incidental expense” has the same meaning as specified in Section 5024.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 104, Sec. 27.)
-------------------------------------------

10007.

“Street” includes the whole or any part of one or more public streets, alleys, or other places in any municipality, and rights of way owned or held by any municipality for the purposes of this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 192.)
-------------------------------------------

10008.

“Assessment district” means the district of land to be benefited by the improvement and to be specially assessed to pay the costs and expenses of the improvement and the damages caused by the improvement.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 192.)
-------------------------------------------

10009.

The provisions of this division apply to all counties and districts, or other public corporations insofar as such corporations have the power applicable to them to make any of the improvements authorized under this division. The officers of such counties, districts, or other public corporations who have similar powers and duties as the municipal officers referred to in this division have the powers and duties given by this division to such municipal officials. Where no similar officer exists, the legislative body of the county, district, or public corporation shall by resolution appoint a person or designate an officer to perform the duties under this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 192.)
-------------------------------------------

10010.

“Acquisition”, or any of its variants, means and includes one or more of the following:

(a) Any works, improvements, appliances, or facilities authorized to be made, constructed, or acquired under this division and which are in existence and installed in place on or before the date of adoption of the resolution of intention for the acquisition thereof; any use or capacity rights in any of the foregoing; and any works, improvements, appliances, or facilities acquired or installed pursuant to Sections 10109 to 10111, inclusive. Any work, improvement, appliance, or facility which was not in existence and installed in place on or before that date may be acquired if it was constructed as if it had been constructed under the direction and supervision or under the authority of the municipality.

(b) Electric current, gas, or other illuminating agent for power or lighting service.

(c) Any real property, rights-of-way, easements, or interests in real property, acquired or to be acquired by gift, purchase, or eminent domain, and which are necessary or convenient in connection with the construction or operation of any work or improvement authorized to be acquired or to be made or constructed under this division, except real property, rights-of-way, easements, or interests in real property shown upon a final map filed with or submitted to the legislative body for acceptance and approval pursuant to the Subdivision Map Act (Division 2 (commencing with Section 66410) of Title 7 of the Government Code) and offered for dedication to public use by that map or by any separate offer of dedication.

(d) The payment in full of all amounts necessary to eliminate any fixed special assessment liens previously imposed upon any assessment parcel included in the new assessment district. The amount of the payment shall be included in the new assessment on the parcel. This subdivision is applicable only where the acquisition is incidental to other acquisitions or improvements.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 446, Sec. 21.)
-------------------------------------------

10011.

“Owner” means the person owning the fee, or the person in whose name the legal title to the property appears, by deed duly recorded in the county recorder’s office of the county in which the property is situated, or the person in possession of the property or buildings under claim of, or exercising acts of ownership over the same for himself, or as the executor, administrator, guardian, or conservator of the owner. If the property is leased, the possession of the tenant or lessee holding and occupying such property shall be deemed to be the possession of the owner.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 730.)
-------------------------------------------

10012.

This division shall be liberally construed in order to effectuate its purposes. No error, irregularity, informality, and no neglect or omission of any officer, in any procedure taken under this division, which does not directly affect the jurisdiction of the legislative body to order the work or improvement, shall avoid or invalidate such proceeding or any assessment for the cost of work done thereunder. The exclusive remedy of any person affected or aggrieved thereby shall be by appeal to the legislative body in accordance with the provisions of this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 310.)
-------------------------------------------

10013.

Whenever any notice, resolution, order, or other matter is required to be published or posted, and the duty of posting or publishing, or procuring the same, is not specifically enjoined upon any officer or person, the clerk shall post or procure the publication or posting thereof, as the case may be.

No step in any proceeding shall be invalidated or affected by any error or mistake or departure from the provisions of this section as to the officer or person posting or publishing, or procuring the publication or posting, of any notice, resolution, order, or other matter when the same is actually published or posted for the time required.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 310.)
-------------------------------------------

10014.

The failure of the clerk to mail any notice or the failure of any person to receive the same shall not affect in any way whatsoever the validity of any proceedings taken under this division, nor prevent the legislative body from proceeding with any hearing so noticed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 310.)
-------------------------------------------

10015.

No notice, nor any publication of any notice, order, resolution, or other matter, other than that expressly provided in this part or elsewhere in this division, shall be necessary to give validity to any of the proceedings provided in this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 310.)
-------------------------------------------

10016.

Any resolution, notice, report, diagram, or assessment which is required to contain a description of the improvements, the boundaries of the assessment district or any zones therein, or the lines and dimensions of any parcel of land, may, for a full and detailed description thereof, refer to any plan or map which is on file with the clerk, the county auditor, or the county assessor and which is open to public inspection. The plan or map so referred to shall govern for all details of the description.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1298, Sec. 20.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 2. Improvements Authorized [10100. - 10112.]

10100.

Whenever the public interest or convenience requires, the legislative body of any municipality may install in or along its streets all or any of the following:

(a) Water mains, pipes, conduits, tunnels, hydrants, and other necessary works and appliances for providing water service.
